Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. Generally

§ 18-10-101.
County commissioners may purchase, construct, accept by gift, museums and collections of exhibits.

Each board of county commissioners may purchase, construct or acquire by donation or otherwise archaeological, geological and historical museums and collections of exhibits and articles to be included in or added to the museums and collections.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 31, § 1; 1963, ch. 40, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-10-102.
Appropriation for construction and maintenance; annual tax levy.

Each board of county commissioners of any county owning, constructing or acquiring any museum or collection of exhibits may annually levy a tax on the taxable valuation of the property in the county, for the construction, maintenance and support of the museum or collection of exhibits. The levy shall be made at the same time as other county and school levies are made. The proceeds from the collection of the levy shall be placed in a special fund by the county treasurer and used solely for the purpose for which the levy was made.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 31, § 2; 1963, ch. 40, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1994, ch. 19, § 1.

§ 18-10-103.
Board of trustees; appointment; composition; qualifications of members; terms of office; vacancies; removal.

Each board of county commissioners of any county owning, constructing or acquiring any museum or collection of exhibits shall appoint a board of trustees for the museum or collection composed of five (5) electors of the county. The initial board of trustees shall be appointed as follows: one (1) member for a one (1) year term, two (2) for a two (2) year term and two (2) for a three (3) year term, with each term commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment. Thereafter the terms shall be three (3) years. Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms.

The county commissioners may remove any member of the board of trustees for cause without a public hearing unless the trustee requests that the action be taken during a public hearing. Vacancies on the board of trustees shall be filled by the county commissioners for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 31, § 3; 1963, ch. 40, § 3; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1983, ch. 52, § 1; 2012, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

designated the existing paragraph as (a), added “year” after “a two (2)” in (a); and added (b).

Laws 2012, ch. 104 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

§ 18-10-104.
Board of trustees; duties generally; employment of personnel; rules and regulations.

Each board of trustees of a county museum or collection of exhibits shall:

Have the custody and control of the museum or collection;

Employ such personnel as required;

Make rules and regulations as necessary for the preservation, maintenance, operation and display of the museum or collection of exhibits;

Consult with the department of state parks and cultural resources on matters relating to the management and operation of the county museum and enter into agreements with the department of state parks and cultural resources for the purpose of lending or borrowing materials and improving the management and operation of the county museum;

Annually not later than June 1, file with the board of county commissioners a report detailing all gifts and donations made to the museum or collection and the receipts and expenditures during the preceding fiscal year, together with estimated requirements for expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 31, §§ 4 to 6; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to director of state archives and historical department, see §

9-2-401

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 18-10-105.
Board of trustees; authority to provide funds for preservation of historical artifacts and landmarks.

The board of county commissioners may provide funds for the preservation of historical artifacts and landmarks when the same are threatened with removal or destruction.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 31, § 7; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.